src/fst/filters/upcase-guessed_proper-strings.est.xfscript
# Make initial upcasing for guessed names 
# This is because the guesser uses patterns of lower case letters only,
# but orthography requires names to have initial letter upper case

define up [ 
a -> A,
b -> B,
c -> C,
d -> D,
e -> E,
f -> F,
g -> G,
h -> H,
i -> I,
j -> J,
k -> K,
l -> L,
m -> M,
n -> N,
o -> O,
p -> P,
q -> Q,
r -> R,
s -> S,
t -> T,
u -> U,
v -> V,
w -> W,
x -> X,
y -> Y,
z -> Z,
á -> Á,
č -> Č,
đ -> Đ,
ŋ -> Ŋ,
š -> Š,
ŧ -> Ŧ,
ž -> Ž,
õ -> Õ,
ä -> Ä,
ö -> Ö,
ü -> Ü
|| .#. _  ] ;

regex up ;
